Arkansas, session 2025, HB1863.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1705 is amended to read as follows:
23-99-1705. Claims.
(a) A contracting entity shall pay a claim for ambulance services for
which prior authorization was received regardless of the terminology used by
the transportation benefit manager or health benefit plan within thirty (30)
days of receipt of the claim from an ambulance provider, unless:
(1) Authorized ambulance services were never performed; or
(2) There is specific information available for review by the
appropriate state or federal agency that the subscriber or ambulance provider
has engaged in material misrepresentation, fraud, or abuse regarding the
claim for the authorized ambulance services.
(b)(1) A healthcare insurer or transportation benefit manager shall
pay two hundred fifty percent (250%) of the Medicare Ambulance Fee Schedule,
Rural Rate for a claim for ambulance services to an ambulance provider.
(2) An ambulance provider shall accept the payment under
subdivision (b)(1) of this section as payment in full for services provided
to the subscriber.
*ANS340*
03/19/2025 4:34:55 PM ANS340

HB1863
(3) An ambulance provider shall not balance bill or otherwise
demand a payment from the subscriber other than a deductible, copayment, or
coinsurance required under the subscriber's health benefit plan.
(c) Ambulance services authorized or guaranteed for payment under this
section for which the prior authorization is not rescinded or reversed under
subsection (a) of this section are not subject to audit recoupment.
(d)(c) A claim submitted by an ambulance provider shall include any
information as required by the Insurance Commissioner.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1706, concerning enforcement and
rules of the Transportation Benefit Manager Act, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(d)(1) On and after July 1, 2025, the Arkansas Ambulance Association
shall collect the rates that are approved or contracted for between an
ambulance provider and a local government entity as provided for under § 14-
266-105.
(2) The information required under subdivision (d)(1) of this
section shall be submitted annually to the commissioner.

SECTION 3. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is necessary to resolve a
conflict regarding in-network and out-of-network reimbursement rates for
ambulance services; that the conflict is causing confusion between ambulance
providers, insurers, and the State Insurance Department; and that this act is
immediately necessary to alleviate confusion concerning reimbursement rates
for ambulance services. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and
this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public
peace, health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.


03/19/2025 4:34:55 PM ANS340